Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-909
License; renewal; qualifications.

To renew a license as a clinical nurse specialist, the applicant shall have current certification by an approved certifying body as a clinical nurse specialist or, when such certification is not available, an alternative method of competency assessment by any means approved by the board.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 261.